Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$23,850,000 is  established for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2015, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Re-
ceipts and reimbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in this section, collected or received by the Higher  Education
Coordinating Commission, for expenditures of proceeds from state bonds issued for the  ben-
efit of a community college,  pursuant to agreements between the commission and a com-
munity college.
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 9, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 20, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5043 (HB 5043-A) Page 1